Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-116.6] Denial of claims;
compliance requirements. (a) If a claim under a long-term care insurance
contract is denied, the issuer, within sixty days of the date of a written
request by the policyholder or certificate holder, or a representative thereof
shall:

(1) Provide a written explanation of the reasons for
the denial; and

(2) Make available all information directly related
to the denial.

(b) Any policy or rider advertised, marketed,
or offered as long-term care or nursing home insurance shall comply with this
article. [L 2007, c 233, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next